apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON ADVERB !Recent loanwords on -ærbba with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ærbba%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:erb%> R ;
 +N:ærbba%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ærbba%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ærbba» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ærbba» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ærbba» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ærbba%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ærbba%>Q1j R ;


LEXICON TABELL !Recent loanwords on -äl0la with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:æl'la%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ell%> R ;
 +N:æl'la%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:æl'la%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:æl'la» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:æl'la» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:æl'la» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:æl'la%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:æl'la%>Q1j R ;


LEXICON AREAL !Recent loanwords on -álla with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:álla%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:al%> R ;
 +N:álla%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:álla%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:álla» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:álla» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:álla» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:álla%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:álla%>Q1j R ;


LEXICON TELEGRAM !Recent loanwords on -ám'ma with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ám'ma%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:am%> R ;
 +N:ám'ma%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ám'ma%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ám'ma» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ám'ma» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ám'ma» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ám'ma%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ám'ma%>Q1j R ;


LEXICON ORGAN !Recent loanwords on -ádna with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ádna%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:an%> R ;
 +N:ádna%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ádna%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ádna» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ádna» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ádna» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ána%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ána%>j R ;


LEXICON SEMINAR !Recent loanwords on -árra with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:árra%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ar%> R ;
 +N:árra%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:árra%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:árra» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:árra» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:árra» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ára%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ára%>j R ;


LEXICON SBSTANS !Recent loanwords on -ánssa with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ánssa%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ans%> R ;
 +N:ánssa%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ánssa%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ánssa» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ánssa» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ánssa» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ánsa%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ánsa%>j R ;


LEXICON VALENS !Recent loanwords on -ænssa with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ænssa%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ens%> R ;
 +N:ænssa%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ænssa%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ænssa» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ænssa» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ænssa» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ænssa%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ænssa%>Q1j R ;

LEXICON TURIST !Recent loanwords on -ssta with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ssta%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:st9%> R ;
 +N:ssta%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ssta%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ssta» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ssta» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ssta» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:sta%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:sta%>j R ;
 
LEXICON FANATISM !Recent loanwords on -ssma with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:ssma%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:sm%> R ; !SW
 +N:ssma%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:ssma%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ssma» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:ssma» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:ssma» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:sma%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:sma%>j R ;


LEXICON DEMAGOG !Recent loanwords on -ga with long and short compound-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N:a%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:a%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:a» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:a» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:a» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>j R ;


! 4syll stems
! - - - - - -
LEXICON GÅNÅGIS
 +N: GÅNÅGIS-C ;
 +N:a%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
 +N:a»Q1 DenominalNounsMUORRA ;


LEXICON GÅNÅGIS-C
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:a»Q1#gahtes%> ATTR ; gånågahtes is right form
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahtá%> K ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahti%> K ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahtes%> K ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahttá%> PxV ; !^P^
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:a»Q1#gahttá%>n K ;
!! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der/vuohta:a»Q1#gahtes VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> ILL-EVENCASE ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> BU/MUS ;
 +Abe:a%>Q1dak K ;
 +Abe:a%>Q1da K ;
 +SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +SgGenCmp:a%>Q1 R ;
 +PlGenCmp:a%>Q1j R ;


LEXICON GÅNÅGIS-EVEN
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped: PxV ; ! !Spiik not explicit here, thus guessing.
 +Ess:n K ;
! +Ess:n%> PxC ; !^P^ !No Ess+Px according to Spiik, Grundstrom
 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 :Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;

LEXICON CELSIUS
 +N: GÅNÅGIS-C ; ! just as gånågis
 +N:a%> CELSIUS-EVEN ; ! as gånågis, but no Q1 (WeG)
 +N:a» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;

LEXICON CELSIUS-EVEN
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:n%> PxC ; !
 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;

LEXICON BERRAHATTJA !like GÅNÅGIS but pl.
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:a»Q1#gahtes%> ATTR ; bearrahahtes is right form
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahtá%> K ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahti%> K ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahtes%> K ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahttá%> PxV ; !^P^
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:a»Q1#gahttá%>n K ;
!! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der/vuohta:a»Q1#gahtes VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> ILL-EVENCASE ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%> BU/MUS ;
 +N+Abe:a%>Q1dak K ;
 +N+Abe:a%>Q1da K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>Q1j R ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:a%>Q1 PxNomPlV ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#tagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>Q1jt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a%>Q1jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>Q1jda K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>Q1jdis%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ine:a%>Q1jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:a%>Q1jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:a%>Q1js K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:a%>Q1jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:a%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N:a%>Q1» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:a»Q1X7tj OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:a»Q1X7tja K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#tagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:a»Q1X7tjin K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:a»Q1X7tja K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:a»Q1X7tjij K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#dagi K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#dagá K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#tagá K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:a»Q1X7tjij%> PxCs ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:a»Q1X7tjijt K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a»Q1X7tjijd%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:a»Q1X7tjijda K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:a»Q1X7tjijdas%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:a»Q1X7tjijn K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:a»Q1X7tjijn%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:a»Q1X7tjijs K ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:a»Q1X7tjijst%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:a»Q1X7tjij K ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:a»Q1X7tjij%> PxCs ; !^P^



LEXICON JIHPELIJ
 +N+Sg+Nom:ij%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ahá%> PxV ; !
 +N+Ess:ahá%>n K ;
 +N:ahá%> ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +N:ahá%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N:ahá» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:#»ahtes%> ATTR ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahtá%> K ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahti%> K ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahtes%> K ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:#»ahttá%> PxV ; !
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:#»ahttá%>n K ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der/vuohta:#»ahtes VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%> ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%> BU/MUS ;
 +N+Abe:ahá%>Q1dak K ;
 +N+Abe:ahá%>Q1da K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ij%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ahá%>Q1 R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ahá%>Q1j R ;

LEXICON NounRoot
 adno#are^álla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:adno#are^ AREAL ; !
 aktionissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aktioni TURIST ; !SW !
 ålggolij+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ålggol JIHPELIJ ; !
åmastus:åmastuss GÅNÅGIS ;
ambivalænssa:ambival VALENS ;
 ámmát#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ámmát#org ORGAN ; !
animissma:animi FANATISM ;
 arkeologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:arkeolog DEMAGOG ; !
åvdås#vásstádus:åvdås#vásstáduss GÅNÅGIS ;
åvddånahttem#pro^grám0ma:åvddånahttem#pro^gr TELEGRAM ;
back^flip CELSIUS ;
bilingvalissma:bilingvali FANATISM ;
blues CELSIUS ;
 bussa#terminálla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bussa#termin AREAL ; !
chiffer#tele^grám0ma:chiffer#tele^gr TELEGRAM ;
cotangænssa:cotang VALENS ;
dánssa:d SBSTANS ;
 dárrolasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dárroladtj GÅNÅGIS ; !
 dekádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dek ORGAN ; !
dia^grám0ma:dia^gr TELEGRAM ;
dialoga:dialog DEMAGOG ;
 dispænssa:disp VALENS ; !SW
 doajmma#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:doajmma#org ORGAN ; !
doajmma#pládna:doajmma#pl ORGAN ;
doajmma#pro^grám0ma:doajmma#pro^gr TELEGRAM ;
 doarjja#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:doarjja#org ORGAN ; !
dokumentarissma:dokumentari FANATISM ;
 ednam#are^álla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ednam#are^ AREAL ; !
 ednam#háldadim#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ednam#háldadim#org ORGAN ; !
 ednam#viddno#are^álla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ednam#viddno#are^ AREAL ; !
 ednam#vuobddem#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ednam#vuobddem#org ORGAN ; !
eksistænssa:eksist VALENS ;
ekvivalænssa:ekvival VALENS ;
fetisjissma:fetisji FANATISM ;
 filmma#festiválla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:filmma#festiv AREAL ; !
flora^grám0ma:flora^gr TELEGRAM ;
 gahpanisá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG:gahpaniss BERRAHATTJA ; !
 gahpanisá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG:gahpaniss BERRAHATTJA ; !
gájbbádus:gájbbáduss GÅNÅGIS ;
 geologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:geolog DEMAGOG ; !
 giella#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:giella#org ORGAN ; !
 giella#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:giella#org ORGAN ; !
 gitárra:git SEMINAR ; !NOR
guoddalus:guoddaluss GÅNÅGIS ;
 háldadus#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:háldadus#org ORGAN ; !
herma^frodittissma:herma^froditti FANATISM ;
 ide^alissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ide^ali TURIST ; !
ideo^grám0ma:ideo^gr TELEGRAM ;
intelligænssa:intellig VALENS ;
interferænssa:interfer VALENS ;
jåhtålus:jåhtåluss GÅNÅGIS ;
jingo^issma:jingo^i FANATISM ;
kataloga:katalog DEMAGOG ;
key^board CELSIUS ;
kondolanse#tele^grám0ma:kondolanse#tele^gr TELEGRAM ;
kon^gru^ænssa:kon^gru^ VALENS ;
kon^kretissma:kon^kreti FANATISM ;
 kriterij+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:kriter JIHPELIJ ; !
 kránssa:kr SBSTANS ; !^LOAN
 láddelasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:láddeladtj GÅNÅGIS ; !
 lijgge#befálla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:lijgge#bef AREAL ; !NOR !
lobby^issma:lobby^i FANATISM ;
 mete^orologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:mete^orolog DEMAGOG ; !
 miehttse#are^álla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:miehttse#are^ AREAL ; !
 mierredim#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:mierredim#org ORGAN ; !
monetarissma:monetari FANATISM ;
 nammadus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:nammaduss GÅNÅGIS ; !
 nazissma+Use/Sub:nazi FANATISM ; ! 
 oarjjelij+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:oarjjel JIHPELIJ ; !
oscillo^grám0ma:oscillo^gr TELEGRAM ;
playboy CELSIUS ;
polyte^issma:polyte^i FANATISM ;
potænssa:pot VALENS ;
prologa:prolog DEMAGOG ;
 psykologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:psykolog DEMAGOG ; !
radio^grám0ma:radio^gr TELEGRAM ;
 ruossjalasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ruossjaladtj GÅNÅGIS ; !
siffer#tele^grám0ma:siffer#tele^gr TELEGRAM ;
 skåvllå#ásadus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:skåvllåásaduss GÅNÅGIS ; !
skjematissma:skjemati FANATISM ;
 sosiologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sosiolog DEMAGOG ; !
stand-up CELSIUS ;
 suorgge#orgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suorgge#org ORGAN ; !
 telefonissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:telefoni TURIST ; !
tele^grám0ma:tele^gr TELEGRAM ;
tendænssa:tend VALENS ;
 teologa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:teolog DEMAGOG ; !
tsuojggidus:tsuojggiduss GÅNÅGIS ;
urbanissma:urbani FANATISM ;
viehkke#pro^grám0ma:viehkke#pro^gr TELEGRAM ;
 vuostasj#amanu^ænssa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuostasj#amanu^ VALENS ; !
 vuovdde#are^álla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuovdde#are^ AREAL ; !
